Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-1313
Priority list; factors to be considered.

In establishing the priority list under section 74-1312, the department shall consult with governmental subdivisions to determine where railroad crossing safety measures are needed. The department shall consider the accident history of the crossing, the amount of traffic at the crossing, traffic speed limits, population density, visibility of the crossing, any information provided by notices filed with the commission under section 74-1316, the results of any investigations conducted by the Public Service Commission under section 75-426, and similar factors.

Laws 1979, LB 42, § 4.